Utah statutes.
26-18-603.   Adjudicative proceedings related to Medicaid funds.

(1)  If a proceeding of the department, under Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, relates in any way to recovery of Medicaid funds:

(a)  the presiding officer shall be designated by the executive director of the department and report directly to the executive director or, in the discretion of the executive director, report directly to the director of the Office of Internal Audit and Program Integrity; and

(b)  the decision of the presiding officer is the recommended decision to the executive director of the department or a designee of the executive director who is not in the division.

(2)  Subsection (1) does not apply to hearings conducted by the Department of Workforce Services relating to medical assistance eligibility determinations.

(3)  If a proceeding of the department, under Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, relates in any way to Medicaid or Medicaid funds, the following may attend and present evidence or testimony at the proceeding:

(a)  the director of the Office of Internal Audit and Program Integrity, or the director's designee; and

(b)  the inspector general of Medicaid services, if an Office of Inspector General of Medicaid Services is created by statute, or the inspector general's designee.

(4)  In relation to a proceeding of the department under Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, a person may not, outside of the actual proceeding, attempt to influence the decision of the presiding officer.



Enacted by Chapter 362, 2011 General Session

